morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
LEXICON NomPredicateMAK

%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredPagr3s;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredPagr3p;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredDir;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        CplAll;

                                       NomPredQ;

LEXICON NomPredQ

%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                         NomPredQCont;


LEXICON NomPredQCont

%<cpl%:pres%>:@MB                         ENDLEX;

%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        NomPredPagr;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        NomPredDir;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        CplAll;

LEXICON NomPredPagr
%<cpl%:pres%>%<1s%>:^(y)^NS^Im@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<2s%>:s^NS^In@MB          NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<1p%>:^(y)^NS^Iz@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<2p%>:s^NS^In^Iz@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
                                        NomPredPagr3s;

LEXICON NomPredPagr3s

%<cpl%:pres%>%<3s%>:0@MB             NomPredPagrCont;


LEXICON NomPredPagrCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    CVcesine;
                    DIrEnd;


LEXICON  NomPredPagr3p
%<cpl%:pres%>%<3p%>:l^NS^Ar@MB         NomPredPagr3pCont;
%<3p%>:l^NS^Ar@MB                      PAgrCplAll;

LEXICON NomPredPagr3pCont
                        NomPredPagrCont;        ! includes end state
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      NomPred3pQCont;

LEXICON  NomPred3pQCont
                        NomPredPagrCont;        ! includes end state
                        PAgrCplAll;

LEXICON NomPredDir
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB  NomPredDirCont;

LEXICON NomPredDirCont
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB    ENDLEX;

LEXICON DIrEnd
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB  ENDLEX;

!
! Rules governing adjectives and adverbs
!
!
! TODO: proper handling of derivations
!           . adj -> adv zero derivation
!           . -ca -casi etc.

LEXICON Adj
%<Adj%>:@RB        AdjCont;

%<Adj%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdjCont;


LEXICON Adj_typo

%<Adj%:typo%>:@RB     AdjCont;
%<Adj%:type%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdjCont;


LEXICON AdjPartLast
%<Adj%:partial%>:@RB        AdjCont;

LEXICON AdjPart
%<Adj%:partial%>:@RB        ENDLEX;

LEXICON AdjNcomp
@NCOMP%<Adj%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB AdjCont;

LEXICON  AdjCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    NomPredicate;
                    Jderiv;

LEXICON AdvHep
                    HepPrn;
                    Adv;

LEXICON Adv
%<Adv%>:@RB         AdvCont;

%<Adv%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdvCont;



LEXICON Adv_typo

%<Adv%:typo%>:@RB     AdjCont;
%<Adv%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdvCont;


LEXICON AdvPartLast
%<Adv%:partial%>:@RB        AdvCont;

LEXICON AdvPart
%<Adv%:partial%>:@RB        ENDLEX;
                  
LEXICON QAdv
%<Adv%:qst%>:@RB  AdvCont;

%<Adv%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvCont;


LEXICON QAdj
%<Adj%:qst%>:@RB  AdjCont;

%<Adj%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdjCont;


LEXICON AdvTime
%<Adv%>:@RB         AdvTimeCont;

%<Adv%:mredup%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvTimeCont;


LEXICON QAdvTime
%<Adv%:qst%>:@RB    AdvTimeCont;

%<Adv%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvCont;


LEXICON AdvTimeCont
                    Ki;
                    AdvCont;
                    D_lArI;
                    D_lIGInA;
                    CliticSA;

LEXICON AdvCont
                ENDLEX;
                Aderiv;


!
! Rules governing pronouns
!
! TODO: -(y)ken added to som bare pronouns

LEXICON Prn
%<Prn%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PrnNeg
%<Prn%:neg%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PrnCont  ! this is all, except compounding
    ENDLEX;
    Pderiv;
    NcompCont;

LEXICON PersPrn1s
%<Prn%:pers%:1s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnPlu;
%<Prn%:pers%:1s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnCont;
LEXICON PersPrn2s
%<Prn%:pers%:2s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnPlu;
%<Prn%:pers%:2s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnCont;
LEXICON PersPrnPlu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrn3s
%<Prn%:pers%:3s%>:@RB PersPrnCont;
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB PersPrn3sPlu;
LEXICON PersPrn3sPlu
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      PersPrnCont;
                    ENDLEX;

LEXICON PersPrn1p
%<Prn%:pers%:1p%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnContPL;
LEXICON PersPrn2p
%<Prn%:pers%:2p%>:@RB PersPrnContPL;
LEXICON PersPrn3p
%<Prn%:pers%:3p%>:@RB PersPrnContPL;

LEXICON PrnBiri
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB       PrnBiriCont;

LEXICON PrnBiriCont
                        PrnPagr3s;
                        PrnPagr3p;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
                        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnHicbiri
%<Prn%:neg%>:@RB             PrnHicbiriCont;

LEXICON PrnHicbiriCont
                        PrnPagr3s;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
                        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

! this is only 'kendi'
LEXICON PrnRfl
%<Prn%:refl%>:@RB PrnRflCont;

LEXICON PrnRflCont
                    PrnPagr;
                    PersPrnCont;
                    PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnPlu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      PrnPagr1p2p;

LEXICON PrnPagr
            PrnPagr3p;
            PrnPagr3s;
            PrnPagr1p2p;
            PrnPagr1s2s;

LEXICON PrnPagr3p
%<3p%>:l^Ar^I@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr3s
%<3s%>:^(s)^I@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr1s2s
%<1s%>:^(I)m@MB       PersPrnCont;
%<2s%>:^(I)n@MB       PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr1p2p
%<1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB    PersPrnCont;
%<2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB    PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrnCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    Ncase;
                    ND_CA;
                    D_lI;
                    ND_lIk;
                    NomPredicate;

LEXICON PersPrnContPL
                Nplu;
                PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrn
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PPrnBirBir
%<Prn%:rcp%>:@RB BirBirCont;

LEXICON BirBirCont
                        PrnPagr3p;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
%<3p%>:^(s)^I@MB        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnContNoPlu
        Npos;
        Ncase;

LEXICON DemPrn
%<Prn%:dem%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrn
%<Prn%:qst%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrnLoc
%<Prn%:qst%:locp%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrnPers
%<Prn%:qst%:pers%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON LocPrn  ! TODO: these do not inflect except only in some fixed expressions
%<Prn%:locp%>:@RB PrnCont;

!
! Determiners
!

LEXICON  DetDef
%<Det%:def%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndefNeg
%<Det%:indef%:neg%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndef
%<Det%:indef%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndef_typo

%<Det%:indef%:typo%>:@RB    DetCont;


LEXICON  DetDefQ
%<Det%:def%:qst%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndefQ
%<Det%:indef%:qst%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON DetCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    JP_poss;    ! TODO: not all determiners do this.

! Date/time

LEXICON DateStem
%<Num%:date%>:@RB             DateTimeCont;
LEXICON TimeStem
%<Num%:time%>:@RB             DateTimeCont;

LEXICON DateTimeCont
0:@APOS@MB         Ncont;

                    Ncont;


! Number inflections and derivations

LEXICON NumStem
%<Num%>:@RB  NumCont;

%<Num%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;


LEXICON Num_typo

%<Num%:typo%>:@RB   NumCont;
%<Num%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;


LEXICON QNum
%<Num%:qst%>:@RB  NumCont;
%<Num%:qst%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;

LEXICON  NumHalf
buçu^k  NumStem;

LEXICON NumCont
                ENDLEX;
                NumDeriv;
                JP_poss;    ! ikimiz, yedisi, yüzünüz

LEXICON NumericStem
%<Num%:ara%>:@RB             NumericCont;    
!%<Num%>%<dig%>:@RB     NumericCont;    

LEXICON RomanStem
%<Num%:rom%>:@RomNum@RB      NumericCont;
!%<Num%>%<rom%>:@RB     NumericCont;    

LEXICON NumericCont
                ENDLEX;
                NumericApos;
                NumericDotOrd;

LEXICON NumericApos
0:%@APOS@MB      NumDeriv;
0:%@APOS@MB      JP_poss;

                 NumDeriv;
                 JP_poss;


LEXICON NumericDotOrd
%<ord%>:%.@MB      NumericDotOrdCont;

LEXICON   NumericDotOrdCont
                 ENDLEX;
0:%@APOS@MB      AdjCont;

                 AdjCont;


LEXICON NumDeriv
                        NumOrd; 
                        NumDist; 
                        Num_PluCA; 
                        Mderiv;

LEXICON Root
kim         QPrnPers;
ne          QPrn;
ne          QAdj;
nˈere        QPrnLoc; ! TODO: use of this without inflection is non-standard
kaç         QNum; ! this behaves like numbers
ne% zaman   QAdv;
niye        QAdv;
neden       QAdv;
niçin       QAdv;
hani        QPrnLoc;
nˈasıl       QAdv;
nˈasıl       QAdj;
çelişi^k            Adj;
fevri               Adj;  ! adv??
gerçekdış           AdjNcomp;
kadi@DEL@r          Adj;
lisansüst           AdjNcomp;
maun                Adj;
olağandış           AdjNcomp;
olumsuz             Adj;
silindir            Adj;
sınırdış            AdjNcomp;
uydurma             Adj;
yurtdış             AdjNcomp;  !  yurtdışı
canlı               Adj;
kavuniç             AdjNcomp;
tersinir            AdjNcomp;
bilimdış            AdjNcomp;
hip                  Adj;   ! ? tinglish
o% zaman            AdvTime;
ˈilkin               AdvTime;
gece                AdvTime;
öğleüstü            AdvTime;
sabahleyin          AdvTime;
akşam               AdvTime;
aşağı               AdvTime;   ! location
bir% daha           AdvTime;
demin               AdvTime;
akabinde            Adv;
baştanbaşa          Adv;
düpedüz             Adv;
hˈayhay              Adv;
hep                 AdvHep;
mahsus              Adv; 
ne                  QAdv;
şˈeklen              Adv;
yˈeniden             Adv;
birkaç% tane    DetIndef;
birço^k         DetIndef;
kimi            DetIndef;
bu% kadar       DetIndef;
ne% kadar       DetIndef;
çoğu            DetIndef; ! no pronoun
hiçbir          DetIndefNeg;
hiç% bir        DetIndefNeg;
herhangi% bir   DetIndef;
böyle           DetIndef;
öyle% bir       DetIndef;
ne% kadar       DetIndefQ;
o               DetDef;
bu              DetDef;
her             DetDef;    !no pronoun
herbir          DetDef;
tüm             DetDef;
öte             DetDef;    ! somewhat colloquial
beri            DetDef;    ! somewhat colloquial
öbür            DetDef;
tek             DetDef;
hangi           DetDefQ;
ben               PersPrn1s;
sen               PersPrn2s;
o                 PersPrn3s;
biz               PersPrn1p;
siz               PersPrn2p;
bizler            PersPrn1p;
sizler            PersPrn2p;
kendi             PrnRfl;
birbir            PPrnBirBir; ! this has to be inflected
bu                DemPrn;
şu                DemPrn;
o                 DemPrn;
bˈura              LocPrn;
şˈura              LocPrn;
ora               LocPrn;
âlem              PersPrn3p;
cümle% âlem       PersPrn3p;
dünya% âlem       PersPrn3p;
dost% düşman      PersPrn3p;
cümle             Prn;
dünya             PersPrn3p;
falanca           PersPrn3s;
falan             PersPrn3s;
felan             PersPrn3s;
filan             PersPrn3s;
hˈerkes           PersPrn3s;
hˈerkes           PersPrn3p;    ! for compatibility
her% şey          PrnNeg;
hiçbirşey         PrnNeg;
hiç% kimse        PrnNeg;
hiçkimse          PrnNeg;    ! is this singular?
insan             PersPrn3s;
kimi              Prn;
kimse             Prn;
öbürkü            Prn;
öteki             Prn;
şu% bu            Prn;
yedi% mahalle     Prn;
biri                PrnBiri;
hiçbiri             PrnHicbiri;
ˈoncası            Prn;
bir% diğeri       Prn;
çepeçevre           Adv;
seve% seve          Adv;
alımlı     AdjPartLast;
bölük      AdjPartLast;
çarpık     AdjPartLast;
çıka       AdvPartLast;
delik      AdjPartLast;
eski       AdjPartLast;
gümbür     AdvPartLast;
hadsiz     AdjPartLast;
köstek     AdjPartLast;
kütür      AdvPartLast;
sabahlı    AdjPartLast;
sallana    AdvPartLast;
soluğa     AdvPartLast;
toplu      AdjPartLast;
tukur      AdvPartLast;
zırıl      AdvPartLast;
alem              PersPrn3p;
cümle% alem       PersPrn3p;
dünya% alem       PersPrn3p;
bilişöte          AdjNcomp;
çoksesli            Adj;
hizmetönce            AdjNcomp;
bıcır       AdjPart;
abur        AdjPart;
allak       AdjPart;
apar        AdvPart;
cıvıl       AdjPartLast;
darma       AdjPart;
derli       AdjPart;
eciş        AdjPart;
gümbür      AdvPartLast;
manik       AdjPart;
şıklata     AdvPart;
süklüm      AdvPart;
uzadıya     AdvPart;
yourgun     AdvPart;
zangır      AdvPartLast;
zırt        AdvPart;
